California statutes. Education Code
(h) The governing board of a school district shall require that the petitioner or petitioners provide information regarding the proposed operation and potential effects of the charter school, including, but not limited to, the facilities to be used by the charter school, the manner in which administrative services of the charter school are to be provided, and potential civil liability effects, if any, upon the charter school and upon the school district. The description of the facilities to be used by the charter school shall specify where the charter school
 intends to locate. The petitioner or petitioners also shall be required to provide financial statements that include a proposed first-year operational budget, including startup costs, and cashflow and financial projections for the first three years of operation. If the school is to be operated by, or as, a nonprofit public benefit corporation, the petitioner shall provide the names and relevant qualifications of all persons whom the petitioner nominates to serve on the governing body of the charter school.

(i) In reviewing petitions for the establishment of charter schools within the school district, the governing board of the school district shall give preference to petitions that demonstrate the capability to provide comprehensive learning experiences to pupils identified by the petitioner or petitioners as academically low achieving pursuant to the standards established by the department under Section 54032, as that section read before July
 19, 2006.

(j) Upon the approval of the petition by the governing board of the school district, the petitioner or petitioners shall provide written notice of that approval, including a copy of the petition, to the applicable county superintendent of schools, the department, and the state board.

(k) (1) (A) (i) If the governing board of a school district denies a petition, the petitioner may elect to submit the petition for the establishment of a charter school to the county board of education. The petitioner shall submit the petition to the county board of education within 30 days of a denial by the governing board of the school district. At the same time the petition is submitted to the county board of education, the petitioner shall also provide a copy of the petition to the school district. The county board of
 education shall review the petition pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c). If the petition submitted on appeal contains new or different material terms, the county board of education shall immediately remand the petition to the governing board of the school district for reconsideration, which shall grant or deny the petition within 30 days. If the governing board of the school district denies a petition after reconsideration, the petitioner may elect to resubmit the petition for the establishment of a charter school to the county board of education.

(ii) The county board of education shall review the appeal petition pursuant to subdivision (c). If the denial of the petition was made pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (c), the county board of education shall also review the school district’s findings pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (c).

(iii) As used in this
 subdivision, “material terms” of the petition means the signatures, affirmations, disclosures, documents, and descriptions described in subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (h), but shall not include minor administrative updates to the petition or related documents due to changes in circumstances based on the passage of time related to fiscal affairs, facilities arrangements, or state law, or to reflect the county board of education as the chartering authority.

(B) If the governing board of a school district denies a petition and the county board of education has jurisdiction over a single school district, the petitioner may elect to submit the petition for the establishment of a charter school to the state board. The state board shall review a petition submitted pursuant to this subparagraph pursuant to subdivision (c). If the denial of a charter petition is reversed by the state board pursuant to this subparagraph, the state board shall designate
 the governing board of the school district in which the charter school is located as the chartering authority.

(2) If the county board of education denies a petition, the petitioner may appeal that denial to the state board.

(A) The petitioner shall submit the petition to the state board within 30 days of a denial by the county board of education. The petitioner shall include the findings and documentary record from the governing board of the school district and the county board of education and a written submission detailing, with specific citations to the documentary record, how the governing board of the school district and the county board of education abused their discretion. The governing board of the school district and county board of education shall prepare the documentary record, including transcripts of the public hearing at which the governing board of the school
 district and county board of education denied the charter, at the request of the petitioner. The documentary record shall be prepared by the governing board of the school district and county board of education no later than 10 business days after the request of the petitioner is made. At the same time the petition and supporting documentation is submitted to the state board, the petitioner shall also provide a copy of the petition and supporting documentation to the school district and the county board of education.

(B) If the appeal contains new or different material terms, as defined in clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), the state board shall immediately remand the petition to the governing board of the school district to which the petition was submitted for reconsideration. The governing board of the school district shall grant or deny the petition within 30 days. If the governing board of the school district denies a
 petition after reconsideration, the petitioner may elect to resubmit the petition to the state board.

(C) Within 30 days of receipt of the appeal submitted to the state board, the governing board of the school district or county board of education may submit a written opposition to the state board detailing, with specific citations to the documentary record, how the governing board of the school district or the county board of education did not abuse its discretion in denying the petition. The governing board of the school district or the county board of education may submit supporting documentation or evidence from the documentary record that was considered by the governing board of the school district or the county board of education.

(D) The state board’s Advisory Commission on Charter Schools shall hold a public hearing to review the appeal and documentary record. Based on its
 review, the Advisory Commission on Charter Schools shall submit a recommendation to the state board whether there is sufficient evidence to hear the appeal or to summarily deny review of the appeal based on the documentary record. If the Advisory Commission on Charter Schools does not submit a recommendation to the state board, the state board shall consider the appeal, and shall either hear the appeal or summarily deny review of the appeal based on the documentary record at a regular public meeting of the state board.

(E) The state board shall either hear the appeal or summarily deny review of the appeal based on the documentary record. If the state board hears the appeal, the state board may affirm the determination of the governing board of the school district or the county board of education, or both of those determinations, or may reverse only upon a determination that there was an abuse of discretion by both the governing board of the
 school district and the county board of education. Abuse of discretion is the most deferential standard of review, under which the state board must give deference to the decisions of the governing board of the school district and the county board of education to deny the petition. If the denial of a charter petition is reversed by the state board, the state board shall designate, in consultation with the petitioner, either the governing board of the school district or the county board of education in which the charter school is located as the chartering authority.

(3) A charter school for which a charter is granted by either the county board of education or the state board based on an appeal pursuant to this subdivision shall qualify fully as a charter school for all funding and other purposes of this part.

(4) A charter school that receives approval of its petition from a county
 board of education or from the state board on appeal shall be subject to the same requirements concerning geographic location to which it would otherwise be subject if it received approval from the chartering authority to which it originally submitted its petition. A charter petition that is submitted to either a county board of education or to the state board shall meet all otherwise applicable petition requirements, including the identification of the proposed site or sites where the charter school will operate.

(5) Upon the approval of the petition by the county board of education, the petitioner or petitioners shall provide written notice of that approval, including a copy of the petition, to the governing board of the school district in which the charter school is located, the department, and the state board.

(6) If either the county board of education or the state board
 fails to act on a petition within 180 days of receipt, the decision of the governing board of the school district to deny the petition shall be subject to judicial review.

(l) (1) Teachers in charter schools shall hold the Commission on Teacher Credentialing certificate, permit, or other document required for the teacher’s certificated assignment. These documents shall be maintained on file at the charter school and are subject to periodic inspection by the chartering authority. A governing body of a direct-funded charter school may use local assignment options authorized in statute and regulations for the purpose of legally assigning certificated teachers, in accordance with all of the requirements of the applicable statutes or regulations in the same manner as a governing board of a school district. A charter school shall have authority to request an emergency permit or a waiver from the Commission on Teacher
 Credentialing for individuals in the same manner as a school district.

(2) By July 1, 2020, all teachers in charter schools shall obtain a certificate of clearance and satisfy the requirements for professional fitness pursuant to Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341.

(3) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall include in the bulletins it issues pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 44237 to provide notification to local educational agencies of any adverse actions taken against the holders of any commission documents, notice of any adverse actions taken against teachers employed by charter schools, and shall make this bulletin available to all chartering authorities and charter schools in the same manner in which it is made available to local educational agencies.

(m) A charter school shall provide for an annual and independent financial and compliance audit in accordance with Section 41020.

(n) A charter school may encourage parental involvement, but shall notify the parents and guardians of applicant pupils and currently enrolled pupils that parental involvement is not a requirement for acceptance to, or continued enrollment at, the charter school.

(o) The requirements of this section shall not be waived by the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 92.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

47605.1.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a charter school that is granted a charter from the governing board of a school district or county office of education after July 1, 2002, and commences providing educational services to pupils on or after July 1, 2002, shall locate in accordance with the geographic and site limitations of this part.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, a charter school that is granted a charter by the state board after July 1, 2002, and commences providing educational services to pupils on or after July 1, 2002, based on the denial of a petition by the governing board of a school district or county board of education, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (j) of Section 47605, may locate only within the
 geographic boundaries of the chartering entity that initially denied the petition for the charter.

(3) A charter school that receives approval of its charter from a governing board of a school district, a county office of education, or the state board before July 1, 2002, but does not commence operations until after January 1, 2003, shall be subject to the geographic limitations of this part, in accordance with subdivision (d).

(b) This section is not intended to affect the admission requirements contained in subdivision (d) of Section 47605.

(c) (1) A charter school may establish one resource center, meeting space, or other satellite facility within the jurisdiction of the school district where the charter school is physically located if the following conditions are met:

(A) The facility is used exclusively for the educational support of pupils who are enrolled in nonclassroom-based independent study of the charter school.

(B) The charter school provides its primary educational services in, and a majority of the pupils it serves are residents of, the county in which the charter school is authorized.

(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (5) to (9), inclusive, a charter school shall not establish a resource center, meeting space, or other satellite facility in any other location than the one authorized in paragraph (1).

(3) A charter school shall notify the charter school’s chartering authority of the name and physical location of any resource center, meeting space, or other satellite facility operated by that charter
 school.

(4) Notwithstanding Section 33050 or any other law, the state board shall not waive the restrictions listed in this subdivision.

(5) (A) A charter school that was operating a resource center, meeting space, or other satellite facility outside the jurisdiction of the school district where the charter school is physically located before January 1, 2020, may continue to operate the resource center, meeting space, or other satellite facility until the charter school submits a request for the renewal of its charter petition. To continue operating the resource center, meeting space, or other satellite facility, the charter school, before submitting the request to the charter school’s chartering authority for the renewal of the charter petition, shall first obtain approval in writing from the school district where the resource center, meeting space, or other
 satellite facility is operating.

(B) The department shall regard as a continuing charter school for all purposes a nonclassroom-based charter school that was granted approval of its petition, that was providing educational services to pupils before October 1, 2019, and is authorized by a different chartering authority due to changes to this subdivision by the addition of this paragraph that took effect January 1, 2020.

(6) A countywide charter school approved by a county office of education that is operating a resource center, meeting space, or other satellite facility in a county other than the county in which the countywide charter school is authorized before January 1, 2020, may continue to operate that resource center, meeting space, or other satellite facility until the countywide charter school submits a request for the renewal of its charter petition. To continue operating
 the resource center, meeting space, or other satellite facility, the countywide charter school, before submitting the request to the countywide charter school’s chartering authority for the renewal of the charter petition, shall obtain approval in writing from the county office of education where the resource center, meeting space, or other satellite facility is operating.

(7) If a Presidential declaration of a major disaster or emergency is issued in accordance with the federal Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5121 et seq.) for an area in which a charter school is operating a resource center, meeting space, or other satellite facility, the charter school, for not more than five years, may relocate the resource center, meeting space, or other satellite facility outside the area subject to the Presidential declaration if the charter school first obtains the written approval of the school district
 where the resource center, meeting space, or other satellite facility is being relocated to.

(8) A charter school may establish additional resource centers, meetings spaces, or other satellite facilities within the jurisdiction of the charter school’s chartering authority only if both of the following are met:

(A) The charter school is physically located within the boundaries of the charter school’s chartering authority.

(B) The charter school has obtained written approval from the charter school’s chartering authority for each additional resource center, meeting space, or other satellite facility.

(9) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (5), a charter school that operates a resource center located in a school district outside of the
 boundaries of the charter school’s authorizing school district may continue to operate the existing resource center if all of the following conditions are met:

(i) The charter school operating the resource center is authorized by, and physically located in, a school district adjacent to a school district with an enrollment of at least 500,000 pupils.

(ii) The charter school operating the resource center was established before January 1, 2009.

(iii) The resource center is physically located in a school district with an enrollment of at least 500,000 pupils and was established before January 1, 2011.

(iv) The resource center serves a pupil population of which at least 50 percent of the pupils are currently or formerly on probation or were formerly
 incarcerated individuals.

(B) A charter school described in this paragraph shall not establish a new resource center outside of the boundaries of the charter school’s authorizing school district.

(d) (1) For a charter school that was granted approval of its charter before July 1, 2002, and provided educational services to pupils before July 1, 2002, this section only applies to new educational services or schoolsites established or acquired by the charter school on or after July 1, 2002.

(2) For a charter school that was granted approval of its charter before July 1, 2002, but did not provide educational services to pupils before July 1, 2002, this section only applies upon the expiration of a charter that is in existence on January 1, 2003.

(3) Notwithstanding other implementation timelines in this section, by June 30, 2005, or upon the expiration of a charter that is in existence on January 1, 2003, whichever is later, all charter schools shall be required to comply with this section for schoolsites at which educational services are provided to pupils before or after July 1, 2002, regardless of whether the charter school initially received approval of its charter school petition before July 1, 2002. To achieve compliance with this section, a charter school shall be required to receive approval of a charter petition in accordance with this section and Section 47605.

(4) This section is not intended to affect the authority of a governmental entity to revoke a charter that is granted on or before the effective date of this section.

(e) A charter school that submits its petition directly to a county board
 of education, as authorized by Section 47605.5 or 47605.6, may establish charter school operations only within the geographical boundaries of the county in which that county board of education has jurisdiction.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the jurisdictional limitations set forth in this section do not apply to a charter school that provides instruction exclusively in partnership with any of the following:

(1) The federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.).

(2) Federally affiliated Youth Build programs.

(3) Federal job corps training or instruction provided pursuant to a memorandum of understanding with the federal provider.

(4) The California
 Conservation Corps or local conservation corps certified by the California Conservation Corps pursuant to Sections 14507.5 or 14406 of the Public Resources Code.

(5) Instruction provided to juvenile court school pupils pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42238.18 or pursuant to Section 1981 for individuals who are placed in a residential facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 68.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

47605.2.

The Delta Charter High School, located in the County of Santa Cruz, is exempt from the geographic and site limitations contained in subdivision (a) of Section 47605.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 112, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

47605.3.

Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 47605, a charter school with a schoolsite physically located in the attendance area of a public elementary school in which 50 percent or more of the pupil enrollment is eligible for free or reduced price meals may give a preference in admissions to pupils who are currently enrolled in that public elementary school and to pupils who reside in the elementary school attendance area where the charter schoolsite is located. This section is not intended to affect the requirement contained in subdivision (e) of Section 47605 that a public school converting partially or entirely to a charter school adopt and maintain a policy that gives an admission preference to pupils who reside within the former attendance area of that public school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 69.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

47605.5.

A petition may be submitted directly to a county board of education in the same manner as set forth in Section 47605 for charter schools that will serve pupils for whom the county office of education would otherwise be responsible for providing direct education and related services. Any denial of a petition shall be subject to the same process for any other county board of education denial of a charter school petition pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 34, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

47605.6.

(a) (1) In addition to the authority provided by Section 47605.5, a county board of education may also approve a petition for the operation of a charter school that operates at one or more sites within the geographic boundaries of the county and that provides instructional services that are not generally provided by a county office of education. A county board of education may approve a countywide charter only if it finds, in addition to the other requirements of this section, that the educational services to be provided by the charter school will offer services to a pupil population that will benefit from those services and that cannot be served as well by a charter school that operates in only one school district in the county. A petition for the establishment of a countywide charter school pursuant
 to this subdivision may be circulated throughout the county by any one or more persons seeking to establish the charter school. The petition may be submitted to the county board of education for review after either of the following conditions is met:

(A) The petition is signed by a number of parents or guardians of pupils residing within the county that is equivalent to at least one-half of the number of pupils that the charter school estimates will enroll in the school for its first year of operation and each of the school districts where the charter school petitioner proposes to operate a facility has received at least 30 days’ notice of the petitioner’s intent to operate a charter school pursuant to this section.

(B) The petition is signed by a number of teachers that is equivalent to at least one-half of the number of teachers that the charter school estimates will be employed
 at the school during its first year of operation and each of the school districts where the charter school petitioner proposes to operate a facility has received at least 30 days’ notice of the petitioner’s intent to operate a charter school pursuant to this section.

(2) An existing public school shall not be converted to a charter school in accordance with this section.

(3) After receiving approval of its petition, a charter school that proposes to establish operations at additional sites within the geographic boundaries of the county board of education shall notify the school districts where those sites will be located. The charter school shall also request a material revision of its charter by the county board of education that approved its charter and the county board of education shall consider whether to approve those additional locations at an open, public meeting, held no
 sooner than 30 days following notification of the school districts where the sites will be located. If approved, the location of the approved sites shall be a material revision of the charter school’s approved charter.

(4) A petition shall include a prominent statement indicating that a signature on the petition means that the parent or guardian is meaningfully interested in having their child or ward attend the charter school, or in the case of a teacher’s signature, means that the teacher is meaningfully interested in teaching at the charter school. The proposed charter shall be attached to the petition.

(b) No later than 60 days after receiving a petition, in accordance with subdivision (a), the county board of education shall hold a public hearing on the provisions of the charter, at which time the county board of education shall consider the level of support for the petition
 by teachers, parents or guardians, and the school districts where the charter school petitioner proposes to place school facilities. Following review of the petition and the public hearing, the county board of education shall either grant or deny the charter within 90 days of receipt of the petition. However, this date may be extended by an additional 30 days if both parties agree to the extension. A petition is deemed received by the county board of education for purposes of commencing the timelines described in this subdivision when the petitioner submits a petition, in accordance with subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), to the county office of education. The county board of education shall publish all staff recommendations, including the recommended findings, regarding the petition at least 15 days before the public hearing at which the county board of education will either grant or deny the charter. At the public hearing at which the county board of education will either grant or
 deny the charter, petitioners shall have equivalent time and procedures to present evidence and testimony to respond to the staff recommendations and findings. A county board of education may impose any additional requirements beyond those required by this section that it considers necessary for the sound operation of a countywide charter school. A county board of education may grant a charter for the operation of a charter school under this part only if it is satisfied that granting the charter is consistent with sound educational practice and that the charter school has reasonable justification for why it could not be established by petition to a school district pursuant to Section 47605. The county board of education shall deny a petition for the establishment of a charter school if it finds one or more of the following:

(1) The charter school presents an unsound educational program for the pupils to be enrolled in the charter school.

(2) The petitioners are demonstrably unlikely to successfully implement the program set forth in the petition.

(3) The petition does not contain the number of signatures required by subdivision (a).

(4) The petition does not contain an affirmation of each of the conditions described in subdivision (e).

(5) The petition does not contain reasonably comprehensive descriptions of all of the following:

(A) (i) The educational program of the charter school, designed, among other things, to identify those pupils whom the charter school is attempting to educate, what it means to be an “educated person” in the 21st century, and how learning best occurs. The goals identified in
 that program shall include the objective of enabling pupils to become self-motivated, competent, and lifelong learners.

(ii) The annual goals for the charter school for all pupils and for each subgroup of pupils identified pursuant to Section 52052, to be achieved in the state priorities, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 52060, that apply for the grade levels served by the charter school, and specific annual actions to achieve those goals. A charter petition may identify additional school priorities, the goals for the school priorities, and the specific annual actions to achieve those goals.

(iii) If the proposed charter school will enroll high school pupils, the manner in which the charter school will inform parents regarding the transferability of courses to other public high schools. Courses offered by the charter school that are accredited by the Western Association
 of Schools and Colleges may be considered to be transferable to other public high schools.

(iv) If the proposed charter school will enroll high school pupils, information as to the manner in which the charter school will inform parents as to whether each individual course offered by the charter school meets college entrance requirements. Courses approved by the University of California or the California State University as satisfying their prerequisites for admission may be considered as meeting college entrance requirements for purposes of this clause.

(B) The measurable pupil outcomes identified for use by the charter school. “Pupil outcomes,” for purposes of this part, means the extent to which all pupils of the charter school demonstrate that they have attained the skills, knowledge, and aptitudes specified as goals in the charter school’s educational program. Pupil outcomes
 shall include outcomes that address increases in pupil academic achievement both schoolwide and for all pupil subgroups served by the charter school, as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 52052. The pupil outcomes shall align with the state priorities, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 52060, that apply for the grade levels served by the charter school.

(C) The method by which pupil progress in meeting those pupil outcomes is to be measured. To the extent practicable, the method for measuring pupil outcomes for state priorities shall be consistent with the way information is reported on a school accountability report card.

(D) The location of each charter school facility that the petitioner proposes to operate.

(E) The governance structure of the charter school, including, but not limited to,
 the process to be followed by the charter school to ensure parental involvement.

(F) The qualifications to be met by individuals to be employed by the charter school.

(G) The procedures that the charter school will follow to ensure the health and safety of pupils and staff. These procedures shall require all of the following:

(i) That each employee of the charter school furnish the charter school with a criminal record summary as described in Section 44237.

(ii) The development of a school safety plan, and the annual review and update of the plan, pursuant to Section 47606.3.

(iii) That the school safety plan be reviewed and updated by March 1 of every year by the charter school.

(H) The means by which the charter school will achieve a balance of racial and ethnic pupils, special education pupils, and English learner pupils, including redesignated fluent English proficient pupils as defined by the evaluation rubrics in Section 52064.5, that is reflective of the general population residing within the territorial jurisdiction of the county board of education to which the charter petition is submitted. Upon renewal, for a charter school not deemed to be a local educational agency for purposes of special education pursuant to Section 47641, the chartering authority may consider the effect of school placements made by the chartering authority in providing a free and appropriate public education as required by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (Public Law 101-476), on the balance of pupils with disabilities at the charter school.

(I) The procedures by which pupils can be suspended or expelled from the charter school for disciplinary reasons or otherwise involuntarily removed from the charter school for any reason. These procedures, at a minimum, shall include an explanation of how the charter school will comply with federal and state constitutional procedural and substantive due process requirements that is consistent with all of the following:

(i) For suspensions of fewer than 10 days, provide oral or written notice of the charges against the pupil and, if the pupil denies the charges, an explanation of the evidence that supports the charges and an opportunity for the pupil
 to present the pupil’s side of the story.

(ii) For suspensions of 10 days or more and all other expulsions for disciplinary reasons, both of the following:

(I) Provide timely, written notice of the charges against the pupil and an explanation of the pupil’s basic rights.

(II) Provide a hearing adjudicated by a neutral officer within a reasonable number of days at which the pupil has a fair opportunity to present testimony, evidence, and witnesses and confront and cross-examine adverse witnesses, and at which the pupil has the right to bring legal counsel or an advocate.

(iii) Contain a clear statement that no pupil shall be involuntarily removed by the charter school for any reason unless the parent or guardian of the pupil has been provided written
 notice of intent to remove the pupil no less than five schooldays before the effective date of the action. The written notice shall be in the native language of the pupil or the pupil’s parent or guardian, or, if the pupil is a homeless child or youth, or a foster child or youth, in the native language of the homeless or foster child’s educational rights holder. In the case of a foster child or youth, the written notice shall also be provided to the foster child’s attorney and county social worker. If the pupil is an Indian child, as defined in Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the written notice shall also be provided to the Indian child’s tribal social worker and, if applicable, county social worker. The written notice shall inform the pupil, the pupil’s parent or guardian, the homeless child’s educational rights holder, the foster child’s educational rights holder, attorney, and county social worker, or the Indian child’s tribal social worker and, if applicable, county social worker of
 the right to initiate the procedures specified in clause (ii) before the effective date of the action. If the pupil’s parent or guardian, the homeless child’s educational rights holder, the foster child’s educational rights holder, attorney, or county social worker, or the Indian child’s tribal social worker or, if applicable, county social worker initiates the procedures specified in clause (ii), the pupil shall remain enrolled and shall not be removed until the charter school issues a final decision. For purposes of this clause, “involuntarily removed” includes disenrolled, dismissed, transferred, or terminated, but does not include suspensions specified in clauses (i) and (ii).

(iv) A foster child’s educational rights holder, attorney, and county social worker and an Indian child’s tribal social worker and, if applicable, county social worker shall have the same rights a parent or guardian of a child has to receive a suspension notice,
 expulsion notice, manifestation determination notice, involuntary transfer notice, and other documents and related information.

(J) The manner by which staff members of the charter school will be covered by the State Teachers’ Retirement System, the Public Employees’ Retirement System, or federal social security.

(K) The procedures
 to be followed by the charter school and the county board of education to resolve disputes relating to provisions of the charter.

(L) Admission policy and procedures, consistent with subdivision (e).

(M) The public school attendance alternatives for pupils residing within the county who choose not to attend the charter school.

(N) The rights of an employee of the county office of education, upon leaving the employment of the county office of education, to be employed by the charter school, and any rights of return to the county office of education that an employee may have upon leaving the employment of the charter school.

(O) The procedures to be used if the charter school closes. The procedures shall ensure a final audit of the charter school to determine the disposition of all assets and liabilities of the charter school,
 including plans for disposing of any net assets and for the maintenance and transfer of pupil records.

(6) A declaration of whether or not the charter school shall be deemed the exclusive public school employer of the employees of the charter school for purposes of the Educational Employment Relations Act (Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(7) Any other basis that the county board of education finds justifies the denial of the petition.

(c) A county board of education that approves a petition for the operation of a countywide charter may, as a condition of charter approval, enter into an agreement with a third party, at the expense of the charter school, to oversee, monitor, and report to the county board of education on the operations of the charter school.
 The county board of education may prescribe the aspects of the charter school’s operations to be monitored by the third party and may prescribe appropriate requirements regarding the reporting of information concerning the operations of the charter school to the county board of education.

(d) (1) Charter schools shall meet all statewide standards and conduct the pupil assessments required pursuant to Section 60605 and any other statewide standards authorized in statute or pupil assessments applicable to pupils in noncharter public schools.

(2) Charter schools shall on a regular basis consult with their parents and teachers regarding the charter school’s educational programs.

(e) (1) In addition to any other requirement imposed under this part, a charter school shall be